Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.020

Membership.

The membership of the school directors' association shall comprise the members of the boards of directors of the school districts of the state.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.020. Prior: 1947 c 169 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4709-21. Formerly RCW 28A.61.020, 28.58.330.]